Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-14]
Enforcement authority. The attorney general or the executive director of
the office of consumer protection is authorized to investigate reported or
suspected violations of the federal mortgage assistance relief services rules,
set forth in title 12 Code of Federal Regulations part 1015, and to enforce
such rules by bringing civil actions or proceedings. [L 2016, c 142, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next